Hawaii statutes.
§459-14 Penalty. Any person practicing
optometry in violation of this chapter or any rule may be fined up to $500 or
be imprisoned not more than six months, or both, for each separate violation,
and each day of the violation shall constitute a separate offense. [L 1917, c
187, §11; RL 1925, §1122; RL 1935, §1380; RL 1945, §2811; RL 1955, §68-14; HRS
§459-14; am L 1985, c 224, §11]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next